Illinois, session 104th, HB2220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Adult Protective Services Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6601)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Adult Protective Services Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-49, eff. 7-1-13.)